District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.45

Penalties.

In addition to the penalties set forth in this chapter, a person who practices pharmaceutical detailing without a license, except as provided in § 3-1205.02(a)(2A), shall be subject to a fine of up to $10,000.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 745
as added Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(g), 55 DCR 1659
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5032(c), 62 DCR 10905
Licensing of health professionals, general qualifications of applicants, see § 3-1205.03.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added “except as provided in § 3-1205.02(a)(2A).”
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5032(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).